California statutes. Penal Code
Upon a showing of good cause, the magistrate may, in his or her discretion, insert a direction in a search warrant that it may be served at any time of the day or night. In the absence of such a direction, the warrant shall be served only between the hours of 7 a.m. and 10 p.m.

When establishing “good cause” under this section, the magistrate shall consider the safety of the peace officers serving the warrant and the safety of the public as a valid basis for nighttime endorsements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1534.

(a) A search warrant shall be executed and returned within 10 days after date of issuance. A warrant executed within the 10-day period shall be deemed to have been timely executed and no further showing of timeliness need be made. After the expiration of 10 days, the warrant, unless executed, is void. The documents and records of the court relating to the warrant need not be open to the public until the execution and return of the warrant or the expiration of the 10-day period after issuance. Thereafter, if the warrant has been executed, the documents and records shall be open to the public as a judicial record.

(b) (1) A tracking device search warrant issued pursuant to paragraph
 (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524 shall identify the person or property to be tracked and shall specify a reasonable length of time, not to exceed 30 days from the date the warrant is issued, that the device may be used. The court may, for good cause, grant one or more extensions for the time that the device may be used, with each extension lasting for a reasonable length of time, not to exceed 30 days. The search warrant shall command the officer to execute the warrant by installing a tracking device or serving a warrant on a third-party possessor of the tracking data. The officer shall perform any installation authorized by the warrant during the daytime unless the magistrate, for good cause, expressly authorizes installation at another time. Execution of the warrant shall be completed no later than 10 days immediately after the date of issuance. A warrant executed within this 10-day period shall
 be deemed to have been timely executed and no further showing of timeliness need be made. After the expiration of 10 days, the warrant shall be void, unless it has been executed.

(2) An officer executing a tracking device search warrant shall not be required to knock and announce their presence before executing the warrant.

(3) No later than 10 calendar days after the use of the tracking device has ended, the officer executing the warrant shall file a return to the warrant.

(4) (A) No later than 10 calendar days after the use of the tracking device has ended, the officer who executed the tracking device warrant shall notify the person who was tracked or whose property was tracked pursuant
 to subdivision (a) of Section 1546.2.

(B) Notice under this paragraph may be delayed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1546.2.

(5) An officer installing a device authorized by a tracking device search warrant may install and use the device only within California.

(6) (A) As used in this section, “tracking device” means any electronic or mechanical device, or software, that permits the tracking of the movement of a person or object.

(B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the use of any device or software for the purpose of tracking the movement of a person or object.

(7) As used in this section, “daytime” means the hours between 6 a.m. and 10 p.m. according to local time.

(c) If a duplicate original search warrant has been executed, the peace officer who executed the warrant shall enter the exact time of its execution on its face.

(d) A search warrant may be made returnable
 before the issuing magistrate or their court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (AB 904)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1535.

When the officer takes property under the warrant, he must give a receipt for the property taken (specifying it in detail) to the person from whom it was taken by him, or in whose possession it was found; or, in the absence of any person, he must leave it in the place where he found the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1536.

All property or things taken on a warrant must be retained by the officer in his custody, subject to the order of the court to which he is required to return the proceedings before him, or of any other court in which the offense in respect to which the property or things taken is triable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1885.)
-------------------------------------------

1536.5.

(a) If a government agency seizes business records from an entity pursuant to a search warrant, the entity from which the records were seized may file a demand on that government agency to produce copies of the business records that have been seized. The demand for production of copies of business records shall be supported by a declaration, made under penalty of perjury, that denial of access to the records in question will either unduly interfere with the entity’s ability to conduct its regular course of business or obstruct the entity from
 fulfilling an affirmative obligation that it has under the law. Unless the government agency objects pursuant to subdivision (d), this declaration shall suffice if it makes a prima facie case that specific business activities or specific legal obligations faced by the entity would be impaired or impeded by the ongoing loss of records.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), when a government agency seizes business records from an entity and is subsequently served with a demand for copies of those business records pursuant to subdivision (a), the government agency in possession of those records shall make copies of those records available to the entity within 10 court days of the service of the demand to produce copies of the records.

(2) In the alternative, the agency in possession of the original records, may in its discretion, make the original records
 reasonably available to the entity within 10 court days following the service of the demand to produce records, and allow the entity reasonable time to copy the records.

(3) No agency shall be required to make records available at times other than normal business hours.

(4) If data is recorded in a tangible medium, copies of the data may be provided in that same medium, or any other medium of which the entity may make reasonable use. If the data is stored electronically, electromagnetically, or photo-optically, the entity may obtain either a copy made by the same process in which the data is stored, or in the alternative, by any other tangible medium through which the entity may make reasonable use of the data.

(5) A government agency granting the entity access to the original records for the purpose of making copies
 of the records, may take reasonable steps to ensure the integrity and chain of custody of the business records.

(6) If the seized records are too voluminous to be reviewed or be copied in the time period required by subdivision (a), the government agency that seized the records may file a written motion with the court for additional time to review the records or make the copies. This motion shall be made within 10 court days of the service of the demand for the records. An extension of time under this paragraph shall not be granted unless the agency establishes that reviewing or producing copies of the records within the 10 court day time period, would create a hardship on the agency. If the court grants the motion, it shall make an order designating a timeframe for the review and the duplication and return of the business records, deferring to the entity the priority of the records to be reviewed, duplicated, and returned first.

(c) If a court finds that a declaration made by an entity as provided in subdivision (a) is adequate to establish the specified prima facie case, a government agency may refuse to produce copies of the business records or to grant access to the original records only under one or both of the following circumstances:

(1) The court determines by the preponderance of the evidence standard that denial of access to the business records or copies of the business records will not unduly interfere with the entity’s ability to conduct its regular course of business or obstruct the entity from fulfilling an affirmative obligation that it has under the law.

(2) The court determines by the preponderance of the evidence standard that possession of the business records by the entity will pose a significant risk of ongoing criminal
 activity, or that the business records are contraband, evidence of criminal conduct by the entity from which the records were seized, or depict a person under the age of 18 years personally engaging in or simulating sexual conduct, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 311.4.

(d) A government agency that desires not to produce copies of, or grant access to, seized business records shall file a motion with the court requesting an order denying the entity copies of and access to the records. A motion under this paragraph shall be in writing, and filed and served upon the entity prior to the expiration of 10 court days following the service of the demand to produce records specified in subdivision (a), within any extension of that time period granted under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), or as soon as reasonably possible after discovery of the risk of harm.

(e) A hearing on a
 motion under subdivision (d) shall be held within two court days of the filing of the motion, except upon agreement of the parties.

(f) (1) Upon filing a motion under subdivision (d) opposing a demand for copies of records, the government agency may file a request in writing, served upon the demanding entity, that any showings of why the material should not be copied and released occur in an ex parte, in camera hearing. If the government agency alleges in its request for an in camera hearing that the demanding entity is, or is likely to become, a target of the investigation resulting in the seizure of records, the court shall hold this hearing outside of the presence of the demanding entity, and any representatives or counsel of the demanding entity. If the government agency does not allege in its request for an in camera hearing that the demanding entity is, or is likely to become, a target of the investigation resulting
 in the seizure of records, the court shall hold the hearing in camera only upon a particular factual showing by the government agency in its pleadings that a hearing in open court would impede or interrupt an ongoing criminal investigation.

(2) At the in camera hearing, any evidence that the government agency may offer that the release of the material would pose a significant risk of ongoing criminal activity, impede or interrupt an ongoing criminal investigation, or both, shall be offered under oath. A reporter shall be present at the in camera hearing to transcribe the entirety of the proceedings.

(3) Any transcription of the proceedings at the in camera hearing, as well as any physical evidence presented at the hearing, shall be ordered sealed by the court, and only a court may have access to its contents, unless a court determines that the failure to disclose the contents of
 the hearing would deprive the defendant or the people of a fair trial.

(4) Following the conclusion of the in camera hearing, the court shall make its ruling in open court, after notice to the demanding entity.

(g) The reasonable and necessary costs of producing copies of business records under this section shall be borne by the entity requesting copies of the records. Either party may request the court to resolve any dispute regarding these costs.

(h) Any motion under this section shall be filed in the court that issued the search warrant.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Seize” means obtaining actual possession of any property alleged by
 the entity to contain business records.

(2) “Business” means an entity, sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation operating legally in the State of California, that sells, leases, distributes, creates, or otherwise offers products or services to customers.

(3) “Business records” means computer data, data compilations, accounts, books, reports, contracts, correspondence, inventories, lists, personnel files, payrolls, vendor and client lists, documents, or papers of the person or business normally used in the regular course of business, or any other material item of business recordkeeping that may become technologically feasible in the future.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1537.

The officer must forthwith return the warrant to the magistrate, and deliver to him a written inventory of the property taken, made publicly or in the presence of the person from whose possession it was taken, and of the applicant for the warrant, if they are present, verified by the affidavit of the officer at the foot of the inventory, and taken before the magistrate at the time, to the following effect: “I, R.S., the officer by whom this warrant was executed, do swear that the above inventory contains a true and detailed account of all the property taken by me on the warrant.”

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1538.

The magistrate must thereupon, if required, deliver a copy of the inventory to the person from whose possession the property was taken, and to the applicant for the warrant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1538.5.

(a) (1) A defendant may move for the return of property or to suppress as evidence any tangible or intangible thing obtained as a result of a search or seizure on either of the following grounds:

(A) The search or seizure without a warrant was unreasonable.

(B) The search or seizure with a warrant was unreasonable
 because any of the following apply:

(i) The warrant is insufficient on its face.

(ii) The property or evidence obtained is not that described in the warrant.

(iii) There was not probable cause for the issuance of the warrant.

(iv) The method of execution of the warrant violated federal or state constitutional standards.

(v) There was any other violation of federal or state constitutional standards.

(2) A motion pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made in writing and accompanied by a memorandum of points and authorities and proof of service. The memorandum shall list the specific items of property or evidence sought to be
 returned or suppressed and shall set forth the factual basis and the legal authorities that demonstrate why the motion should be granted.

(b) When consistent with the procedures set forth in this section and subject to the provisions of Sections 170 to 170.6, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure, the motion should first be heard by the magistrate who issued the search warrant if there is a warrant.

(c) (1) Whenever a search or seizure motion is made in the superior court as provided in this section, the judge or magistrate shall receive evidence on any issue of fact necessary to determine the motion.

(2) While a witness is under examination during a hearing pursuant to a search or seizure motion, the judge or magistrate shall, upon motion of either party, do any of the following:

(A) Exclude all potential and actual witnesses who have not been examined.

(B) Order the witnesses not to converse with each other until they are all examined.

(C) Order, where feasible, that the witnesses be kept separated from each other until they are all examined.

(D) Hold a hearing, on the record, to determine if the person sought to be excluded is, in fact, a person excludable under this section.

(3) Either party may challenge the exclusion of any person under paragraph (2).

(4) Paragraph (2) does not apply to the investigating officer or the investigator for the defendant, nor does it apply to officers having custody of
 persons brought before the court.

(d) If a search or seizure motion is granted pursuant to the proceedings authorized by this section, the property or evidence shall not be admissible against the movant at any trial or other hearing unless further proceedings authorized by this section, Section 871.5, 1238, or 1466 are utilized by the people.

(e) If a search or seizure motion is granted at a trial, the property shall be returned upon order of the court unless it is otherwise subject to lawful detention. If the motion is granted at a special hearing, the property shall be returned upon order of the court only if, after the conclusion of any further proceedings authorized by this section, Section 1238 or 1466, the property is not subject to lawful detention or if the time for initiating the proceedings has expired, whichever occurs last. If the motion is granted at a preliminary
 hearing, the property shall be returned upon order of the court after 10 days unless the property is otherwise subject to lawful detention or unless, within that time, further proceedings authorized by this section, Section 871.5 or 1238 are utilized; if they are utilized, the property shall be returned only if, after the conclusion of the proceedings, the property is no longer subject to lawful detention.

(f) (1) If the property or evidence relates to a felony offense initiated by a complaint, the motion shall be made only upon filing of an information, except that the defendant may make the motion at the preliminary hearing, but the motion shall be restricted to evidence sought to be introduced by the people at the preliminary hearing.

(2) The motion may be made at the preliminary examination only if, at least five court days before the date set for the
 preliminary examination, the defendant has filed and personally served on the people a written motion accompanied by a memorandum of points and authorities as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). At the preliminary examination, the magistrate may grant the defendant a continuance for the purpose of filing the motion and serving the motion upon the people, at least five court days before resumption of the examination, upon a showing that the defendant or his or her attorney of record was not aware of the evidence or was not aware of the grounds for suppression before the preliminary examination.

(3) Any written response by the people to the motion described in paragraph (2) shall be filed with the court and personally served on the defendant or his or her attorney of record at least two court days prior to the hearing at which the motion is to be made.

(g) If the property
 or evidence relates to a misdemeanor complaint, the motion shall be made before trial and heard prior to trial at a special hearing relating to the validity of the search or seizure. If the property or evidence relates to a misdemeanor filed together with a felony, the procedure provided for a felony in this section and Sections 1238 and 1539 shall be applicable.

(h) If, prior to the trial of a felony or misdemeanor, opportunity for this motion did not exist or the defendant was not aware of the grounds for the motion, the defendant shall have the right to make this motion during the course of trial.

(i) If the property or evidence obtained relates to a felony offense initiated by complaint and the defendant was held to answer at the preliminary hearing, or if the property or evidence relates to a felony offense initiated by indictment, the defendant shall have the right to renew
 or make the motion at a special hearing relating to the validity of the search or seizure which shall be heard prior to trial and at least 10 court days after notice to the people, unless the people are willing to waive a portion of this time. Any written response by the people to the motion shall be filed with the court and personally served on the defendant or his or her attorney of record at least two court days prior to the hearing, unless the defendant is willing to waive a portion of this time. If the offense was initiated by indictment or if the offense was initiated by complaint and no motion was made at the preliminary hearing, the defendant shall have the right to fully litigate the validity of a search or seizure on the basis of the evidence presented at a special hearing. If the motion was made at the preliminary hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by all parties, evidence presented at the special hearing shall be limited to the transcript of the preliminary hearing and to evidence that could not
 reasonably have been presented at the preliminary hearing, except that the people may recall witnesses who testified at the preliminary hearing. If the people object to the presentation of evidence at the special hearing on the grounds that the evidence could reasonably have been presented at the preliminary hearing, the defendant shall be entitled to an in camera hearing to determine that issue. The court shall base its ruling on all evidence presented at the special hearing and on the transcript of the preliminary hearing, and the findings of the magistrate shall be binding on the court as to evidence or property not affected by evidence presented at the special hearing. After the special hearing is held, any review thereafter desired by the defendant prior to trial shall be by means of an extraordinary writ of mandate or prohibition filed within 30 days after the denial of his or her motion at the special hearing.

(j) If the property or
 evidence relates to a felony offense initiated by complaint and the defendant’s motion for the return of the property or suppression of the evidence at the preliminary hearing is granted, and if the defendant is not held to answer at the preliminary hearing, the people may file a new complaint or seek an indictment after the preliminary hearing, and the ruling at the prior hearing shall not be binding in any subsequent proceeding, except as limited by subdivision (p). In the alternative, the people may move to reinstate the complaint, or those parts of the complaint for which the defendant was not held to answer, pursuant to Section 871.5. If the property or evidence relates to a felony offense initiated by complaint and the defendant’s motion for the return or suppression of the property or evidence at the preliminary hearing is granted, and if the defendant is held to answer at the preliminary hearing, the ruling at the preliminary hearing shall be binding upon the people unless, upon notice to the
 defendant and the court in which the preliminary hearing was held and upon the filing of an information, the people, within 15 days after the preliminary hearing, request a special hearing, in which case the validity of the search or seizure shall be relitigated de novo on the basis of the evidence presented at the special hearing, and the defendant shall be entitled, as a matter of right, to a continuance of the special hearing for a period of time up to 30 days. The people may not request relitigation of the motion at a special hearing if the defendant’s motion has been granted twice. If the defendant’s motion is granted at a special hearing, the people, if they have additional evidence relating to the motion and not presented at the special hearing, shall have the right to show good cause at the trial why the evidence was not presented at the special hearing and why the prior ruling at the special hearing should not be binding, or the people may seek appellate review as provided in subdivision (o), unless
 the court, prior to the time the review is sought, has dismissed the case pursuant to Section 1385. If the case has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1385, either on the court’s own motion or the motion of the people after the special hearing, the people may file a new complaint or seek an indictment after the special hearing, and the ruling at the special hearing shall not be binding in any subsequent proceeding, except as limited by subdivision (p). If the property or evidence seized relates solely to a misdemeanor complaint, and the defendant made a motion for the return of property or the suppression of evidence in the superior court prior to trial, both the people and defendant shall have the right to appeal any decision of that court relating to that motion to the appellate division, in accordance with the California Rules of Court provisions governing appeals to the appellate division in criminal cases. If the people prosecute review by appeal or writ to decision, or any review thereof, in a felony
 or misdemeanor case, it shall be binding upon them.

(k) If the defendant’s motion to return property or suppress evidence is granted and the case is dismissed pursuant to Section 1385, or the people appeal in a misdemeanor case pursuant to subdivision (j), the defendant shall be released pursuant to Section 1318 if he or she is in custody and not returned to custody unless the proceedings are resumed in the trial court and he or she is lawfully ordered by the court to be returned to custody.

If the defendant’s motion to return property or suppress evidence is granted and the people file a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition pursuant to subdivision (o) or a notice of intention to file a petition, the defendant shall be released pursuant to Section 1318, unless (1) he or she is charged with a capital offense in a case where the proof is evident and the presumption great, or (2) he or she is
 charged with a noncapital offense defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 187) of Title 8 of Part 1, and the court orders that the defendant be discharged from actual custody upon bail.

(l) If the defendant’s motion to return property or suppress evidence is granted, the trial of a criminal case shall be stayed to a specified date pending the termination in the appellate courts of this state of the proceedings provided for in this section, Section 871.5, 1238, or 1466 and, except upon stipulation of the parties, pending the time for the initiation of these proceedings. Upon the termination of these proceedings, the defendant shall be brought to trial as provided by Section 1382, and, subject to the provisions of Section 1382, whenever the people have sought and been denied appellate review pursuant to subdivision (o), the defendant shall be entitled to have the action dismissed if he or she is not brought to trial within 30 days of
 the date of the order that is the last denial of the petition. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall prohibit a court, at the same time as it rules upon the search and seizure motion, from dismissing a case pursuant to Section 1385 when the dismissal is upon the court’s own motion and is based upon an order at the special hearing granting the defendant’s motion to return property or suppress evidence. In a misdemeanor case, the defendant shall be entitled to a continuance of up to 30 days if he or she intends to file a motion to return property or suppress evidence and needs this time to prepare for the special hearing on the motion. In case of an appeal by the defendant in a misdemeanor case from the denial of the motion, he or she shall be entitled to bail as a matter of right, and, in the discretion of the trial or appellate court, may be released on his or her own recognizance pursuant to Section 1318. In the case of an appeal by the defendant in a misdemeanor case from the denial of the motion,
 the trial court may, in its discretion, order or deny a stay of further proceedings pending disposition of the appeal.

(m) The proceedings provided for in this section, and Sections 871.5, 995, 1238, and 1466 shall constitute the sole and exclusive remedies prior to conviction to test the unreasonableness of a search or seizure where the person making the motion for the return of property or the suppression of evidence is a defendant in a criminal case and the property or thing has been offered or will be offered as evidence against him or her. A defendant may seek further review of the validity of a search or seizure on appeal from a conviction in a criminal case notwithstanding the fact that the judgment of conviction is predicated upon a plea of guilty. Review on appeal may be obtained by the defendant provided that at some stage of the proceedings prior to conviction he or she has moved for the return of property or the suppression of the
 evidence.

(n) This section establishes only the procedure for suppression of evidence and return of property, and does not establish or alter any substantive ground for suppression of evidence or return of property. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit a person from making a motion, otherwise permitted by law, to return property, brought on the ground that the property obtained is protected by the free speech and press provisions of the United States and California Constitutions. Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering (1) the law of standing to raise the issue of an unreasonable search or seizure; (2) the law relating to the status of the person conducting the search or seizure; (3) the law relating to the burden of proof regarding the search or seizure; (4) the law relating to the reasonableness of a search or seizure regardless of any warrant that may have been utilized; or (5) the procedure and law relating to a
 motion made pursuant to Section 871.5 or 995, or the procedures that may be initiated after the granting or denial of a motion.

(o) Within 30 days after a defendant’s motion is granted at a special hearing in a felony case, the people may file a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition in the court of appeal, seeking appellate review of the ruling regarding the search or seizure motion. If the trial of a criminal case is set for a date that is less than 30 days from the granting of a defendant’s motion at a special hearing in a felony case, the people, if they have not filed a petition and wish to preserve their right to file a petition, shall file in the superior court on or before the trial date or within 10 days after the special hearing, whichever occurs last, a notice of intention to file a petition and shall serve a copy of the notice upon the defendant.

(p) If a
 defendant’s motion to return property or suppress evidence in a felony matter has been granted twice, the people may not file a new complaint or seek an indictment in order to relitigate the motion or relitigate the matter de novo at a special hearing as otherwise provided by subdivision (j), unless the people discover additional evidence relating to the motion that was not reasonably discoverable at the time of the second suppression hearing. Relitigation of the motion shall be heard by the same judge who granted the motion at the first hearing if the judge is available.

(q) The amendments to this section enacted in the 1997 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature shall apply to all criminal proceedings conducted on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 302, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1539.

(a) If a special hearing is held in a felony case pursuant to Section 1538.5, or if the grounds on which the warrant was issued are controverted and a motion to return property is made (i) by a defendant on grounds not covered by Section 1538.5, (ii) by a defendant whose property has not been offered or will not be offered as evidence against the defendant, or (iii) by a person who is not a defendant in a criminal action at the time the hearing is held, the judge or magistrate shall proceed to take testimony in relation thereto, and the
 testimony of each witness shall be reduced to writing and authenticated by a shorthand reporter in the manner prescribed in Section 869.

(b) The reporter shall forthwith transcribe the reporter’s shorthand notes pursuant to this section if any party to a special hearing in a felony case files a written request for its preparation with the clerk of the court in which the hearing was held. The reporter shall forthwith file in the superior court an original and as many copies thereof as there are defendants (other than a fictitious defendant) or persons aggrieved. The reporter is entitled to compensation in accordance with the provisions of Section 869. In every case in which a transcript is filed as provided in this section, the clerk of the court shall deliver the original of the transcript so filed to the district attorney immediately upon receipt thereof and shall deliver a copy of the transcript to each defendant (other than a fictitious
 defendant) upon demand without cost to the defendant.

(c) Upon a motion by a defendant pursuant to this chapter, the defendant is entitled to discover any previous application for a search warrant in the case which was refused by a magistrate for lack of probable cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 71, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1540.

If it appears that the property taken is not the same as that described in the warrant, or that there is no probable cause for believing the existence of the grounds on which the warrant was issued, the magistrate must cause it to be restored to the person from whom it was taken.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1541.

The magistrate must annex the affidavit, or affidavits, the search warrant and return, and the inventory, and if he has not power to inquire into the offense in respect to which the warrant was issued, he must at once file such warrant and return and such affidavit, or affidavits, and inventory with the clerk of the court having power to so inquire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1881.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.

When a person charged with a felony is supposed by the magistrate before whom he is brought to have on his person a dangerous weapon, or anything which may be used as evidence of the commission of the offense, the magistrate may direct him to be searched in his presence, and the weapon or other thing to be retained, subject to his order, or to the order of the Court in which the defendant may be tried.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, with regards to a search warrant issued upon the grounds specified in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524, the following shall apply:

(a) The law enforcement officer executing the warrant shall take custody of any firearm or ammunition that is in the restrained person’s custody or control or possession or that is owned by the restrained person, which is discovered pursuant to a consensual or other lawful search.

(b) (1) If the location to be searched during the execution of the warrant is jointly occupied by the restrained person and one or more other persons and a law enforcement officer
 executing the warrant finds a firearm or ammunition in the restrained person’s custody or control or possession, but that is owned by a person other than the restrained person, the firearm or ammunition shall not be seized if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The firearm or ammunition is removed from the restrained person’s custody or control or possession and stored in a manner that the restrained person does not have access to or control of the firearm or ammunition.

(B) There is no evidence of unlawful possession of the firearm or ammunition by the owner of the firearm or ammunition.

(2) If the location to be searched during the execution of the warrant is jointly occupied by the restrained person and one or more other persons and a locked gun safe is located that is owned by a person other than
 the restrained person, the contents of the gun safe shall not be searched except in the owner’s presence, and with his or her consent or with a valid search warrant for the gun safe.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Disclosure of Medical Records to Law Enforcement Agencies [1543. - 1545.]

1543.

(a) Records of the identity, diagnosis, prognosis, or treatment of any patient maintained by a health care facility which are not privileged records required to be secured by the special master procedure in Section 1524, or records required by law to be confidential, shall only be disclosed to law enforcement agencies pursuant to this section:

(1) In accordance with the prior written consent of the patient; or

(2) If authorized by an appropriate order of a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the records are located, granted after application showing good cause therefor. In assessing good cause, the court:

(A) Shall weigh the public interest and the need for disclosure against the injury to the patient, to the physician-patient relationship, and to the treatment services;

(B) Shall determine that there is a reasonable likelihood that the records in question will disclose material information or evidence of substantial value in connection with the investigation or prosecution; or

(3) By a search warrant obtained pursuant to Section 1524.

(b) The prohibitions of this section continue to apply to records concerning any individual who
 has been a patient, irrespective of whether or when he or she ceases to be a patient.

(c) Except where an extraordinary order under Section 1544 is granted or a search warrant is obtained pursuant to Section 1524, any health care facility whose records are sought under this chapter shall be notified of the application and afforded an opportunity to appear and be heard thereon.

(d) Both disclosure and dissemination of any information from the records shall be limited under the terms of the order to assure that no information will be unnecessarily disclosed and that dissemination will be no wider than necessary. 

This chapter shall not apply to investigations of fraud in the provision or receipt of Medi-Cal benefits, investigations of insurance fraud performed by the Department of Insurance or the California Highway Patrol, investigations
 of workers’ compensation insurance fraud performed by the Department of Corrections and conducted by peace officers specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 830.2, and investigations and research regarding occupational health and safety performed by or under agreement with the Department of Industrial Relations. Access to medical records in these investigations shall be governed by all laws in effect at the time access is sought.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit disclosure by a medical facility or medical provider of information contained in medical records where disclosure to specific agencies is mandated by statutes or regulations.

(f) This chapter shall not be construed to authorize disclosure of privileged records to law enforcement agencies by the procedure set forth in this chapter, where the privileged records are required to be secured by the
 special master procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1524 or required by law to be confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 490, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1544.
